Wyoming statutes. Title 12 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 2. Retail Licenses and Permits

§ 12-4-201.
Retail liquor licenses and malt beverage permits; population formulas; fees.

A retail liquor license is the authority under which a licensee is permitted to sell alcoholic liquor or malt beverages for use or consumption but not for resale, except as otherwise provided for by this section.

A malt beverage permit is the authority under which the licensee is permitted to sell malt beverages only.

Repealed by Laws 1979, ch. 156, § 4.

The number of retail liquor licenses issued shall be based on the following population formula:

Not more than two (2) licenses in incorporated towns of five hundred (500) population or less;

Not more than one (1) additional license for each additional five hundred (500) population or major fraction thereof in incorporated cities or towns up to a population of nine thousand five hundred (9,500);

Not more than one (1) additional license for each additional full three thousand (3,000) population over nine thousand five hundred (9,500); and

Retail liquor licenses issued to commercial service airports in incorporated cities or towns shall be exempt from the number restrictions in paragraphs (i) through (iii) of this subsection.

The license fee to be assessed for a retail liquor license shall be not less than three hundred dollars ($300.00) nor more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00) payable annually in advance.

Retail liquor licenses and malt beverage permits may be granted by the county commissioners as the appropriate licensing authority in a county outside of incorporated cities and towns as follows:

One (1) retail liquor license issued for each five hundred (500) population residing outside cities and towns; but

No more than three (3) retail liquor licenses issued for locations within five (5) miles of the corporate limits of a city or town. Retail liquor licenses issued to commercial service airports in a county shall be exempt from this paragraph; and

Malt beverage permits may be issued for county locations without regard to population.

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 22, § 3.

The license fee assessed by a county for malt beverage permits shall be not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00).

Licensees authorized to sell alcoholic liquors at retail may purchase for resale not more than nine (9) liters of alcoholic liquors per week from a retail licensee authorized pursuant to this section. Purchases of alcoholic liquors authorized pursuant to this subsection shall be conducted in accordance with the following:

The seller shall record on a form furnished by the division all of the following:

The name and signature of the licensee making the purchase;

The date and time of the purchase;

The purchaser’s Wyoming state tax resale number.

The form collected pursuant to paragraph (i) of this subsection shall be provided to the Wyoming state liquor division within thirty (30) days of the sale and shall be maintained by the seller of the alcoholic liquor for not less than one (1) year after the date of the sale. The form shall be available upon request for the division to inspect.

A retail liquor licensee may ship not more than a total of one hundred eight (108) liters of manufactured wine directly to any one (1) household in this state in any twelve (12) month period provided the licensee:

Ships the manufactured wine only to individuals who are at least twenty-one (21) years of age for such individual’s personal use and not for resale;

Ensures that all shipping containers of manufactured wine shipped pursuant to this subsection are conspicuously labeled with the words: “CONTAINS ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES. ADULT (OVER 21) SIGNATURE REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY”; and

Ensures that all of its shipments within this state are made by a duly licensed carrier and further ensure that the carriers comply with the requirement to obtain an adult signature.

A commercial service airport holding a retail liquor license may contract for or otherwise subcontract any food and beverage services provided at the airport to another individual or entity without transferring the retail liquor license held by the airport under this section.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 87, §§ 2, 3, 10; C.S. 1945, §§ 53-202, 53-203, 53-210; Laws 1951, ch. 22, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 12-2(d), 12-6, 12-14; Laws 1959, ch. 120, § 1; 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1979, ch. 156, §§ 2, 4; 1983, ch. 29, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 203; 2019 ch. 72, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 22, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 77, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (d), deleted “Effective January 1, 1986” at the beginning.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a), added “, except as otherwise provided for by this section” at the end; and added (j).

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, deleted "beyond a five (5) mile zone around incorporated cities and towns" following "county locations" in (f)(iii); and added (k).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 22, § 3, effective July 1, 2021, repealed (g), which read, "The license fee for county retail liquor licenses within five (5) miles of a city or town shall not be less than the comparable fee charged by the adjacent town and all license fees and taxes shall be assessed as provided by law."

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added (d)(iv); added the second sentence in (f)(ii); added (m); and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Allowable licenses. —

Three retail liquor licenses can be issued within the five-mile limit of each municipality with overlapping five-mile zones, provided that no one municipality has more than three licenses within its five-mile zone. Demos v. Board of County Comm'rs, 571 P.2d 980,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 301

(Wyo. 1977).

Cited

in

Dubray v. Howshar, 884 P.2d 23,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 1994).

§ 12-4-202.
Licenses or permits issued prior to April 1, 1961; replacements. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 22, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 12-7; Laws 1959, ch. 120, §§ 2, 3; W.S. 1977, §§ 12-2-102, 12-2-104; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; repealed by 2017 ch. 50, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 12-4-203.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 92, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1935, ch. 87, § 13, related to sales by drugstores.